Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 11. Mainstreet Program

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007 ch. 101, § 2 renumbered former §§

11-45-101

, 11-45-103, and

11-45-104

as
§§

9-12-901

,

9-12-903

, and

9-12-904

and enacted
§

9-12-905

. This article has been set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

Laws 2007, ch. 101, §§ 5-7, state as follows:

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 8, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 9-12-1101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Board” means the Wyoming main street advisory board;

“Business area” means a commercial area existing at the time services under the Wyoming main street program are requested by a municipality;

“Municipality” means a city, town, county or district;

“Revitalization” means the process of engaging in activities to increase economic activity while preserving and building upon a location’s historically significant characteristics.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 1; 2007, ch. 101, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted former (a)(iv) which pertained to the definition of “‘Pilot Program’” and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2, amended and renumbered former

11-45-101

as

9-12-901

. The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

§ 9-12-1102.
Wyoming main street advisory board.

There is created a Wyoming main street advisory board. The board shall consist of seven (7) members appointed by the governor, not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of whom shall be from the same political party. Board members shall elect from their membership a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary.

The governor may remove any member of the board as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

.

Board members shall serve a three (3) year term provided that of the initial board, two (2) members shall be appointed for a one (1) year term, two (2) members for two (2) year terms and three (3) members for three (3) year terms. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the unexpired term.

Members of the board shall receive the same per diem, expenses and travel allowance as members of the legislature while in actual attendance at meetings of the board and the performance of their duties relative thereto.

The department shall provide staff services as required by the board to carry out the board’s duties.

The board shall meet as often as necessary to conduct business, but not less than three (3) times each year. Meetings shall be called by the chairman. A majority of members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 1; 2007, ch. 101, § 3; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007 ch 101, 3, effective July 1, 2007, renumbered

11-45-102

as

9-12-902

. The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 9-12-1103.
Duties of the board.

The board shall:

Assist the council in developing a plan to operate the Wyoming main street program;

Annually review the program and report findings and recommendations, including recommendations for future legislation, to the governor;

Provide a comprehensive evaluation of the Wyoming main street program annually to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee no later than September 1 of each year. The report shall include findings and recommendations, including recommendations for future legislation.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 1; 2007, ch. 101, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “council” for “department” in (i) , and rewrote (iii) establishing a date limitation for providing a comprehensive annual evaluation of the program.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2, amended and renumbered former 11-45-103 as

9-12-903

. The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

§ 9-12-1104.
Duties of the council.

The council shall establish and administer a Wyoming main street program to coordinate state and local participation in programs offered by the national main street center, created by the national trust for historic preservation, to assist municipalities in planning, managing and implementing programs for the revitalization of business areas.

In carrying out subsection (a) of this section, the council shall:

Enter into contracts to obtain business area revitalization services;

Subject to legislative authorization, employ any staff necessary to operate the Wyoming main street program;

With advice from the board, develop a plan describing the objectives of the Wyoming main street program and methods by which the council shall:

Coordinate the activities of that program with private and public sector revitalizations of business areas;

Solicit and use private sector funding for revitalization of business areas;

Assist municipalities engaged in the revitalization of their business areas.

Coordinate with other state and local public and private entities that provide services to municipalities undertaking projects for the revitalization of business areas;

Provide training, technical assistance and information on the revitalization of business areas to municipalities which do not participate in the Wyoming main street program;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 8, § 2.

The council shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 1; 2007, ch. 101, § 2; 2009, ch. 8, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “council” for “department” throughout section; in (b), deleted “provided by the national main street center” following “services” in (i), substituted “building exterior improvements” for “storefront renovations” in (vi); and substituted “article” for “chapter” in (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2, amended and renumbered former

11-45-104

as

9-12-904

. The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (b)(vi), which read: “Administer a revolving loan fund consisting of available federal, state and private sector funding. The fund shall be used to provide a source of monies for building exterior improvements. The council shall have authority to seek and accept federal, state and private funding for purposes of establishing the revolving loan fund and all such federal, state and private funds so received are continuously appropriated to the council for purpose of this paragraph.”

§ 9-12-1105.
Main street program.

The council with advice from the board shall determine the number of municipalities to participate in the Wyoming main street program. The council shall select program participants that represent different geographical regions or populations. The council shall hold at least one (1) public hearing before making selections under this subsection.

In making its selection pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the council, with the assistance of the board, shall develop criteria for use in selecting program participants which relate to at least the following issues:

Private and public sector interest in and commitment to revitalization of a business area selected by the municipality;

Potential private sector investment in a business area selected by the municipality;

Local organizational and financial commitment to employ a program manager for not less than three (3) years;

Local assistance in paying for the services of a design consultant recommended by the advisory board;

Local commitment to assist in training programs to direct activities related to business areas in municipalities that do not participate in the Wyoming main street program.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “subsection (a)” for “subsection (b)” in the introductory language of (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 1, enacted this section as

9-12-905

. The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.